Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4806
Summons to appear; service.

Upon filing the petition, a notice of filing, together with a copy of the petition for emancipation and a summons to appear at the hearing, shall be served:

(1)(a) Upon the parents or legal guardian of the minor or, if the parents or legal guardian cannot be found, the nearest known relative of the minor residing within the state, if any; and

(b) Upon the legal custodian of the minor, if any; or

(2) By publication pursuant to section 25-519, if service pursuant to subdivision (1) of this section is not possible.

Laws 2018, LB714, § 6.